Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Article 8. Operations.

§ 81-14-351.
Generally accepted accounting principles.

Savings banks shall maintain their books and records in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 84; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 86; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 86, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-353.
Liquidity.

Savings banks shall maintain cash and readily marketable investments in an amount that may be established in the rules and regulations of the commissioner, but such amount shall not be less than ten percent (10%) of the assets of the savings bank. Upon receipt of a duly certified copy of a resolution by the board of directors of any savings bank requesting a temporary suspension, the commissioner may suspend the liquidity requirement for a period not longer than six (6) months.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 85; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 87; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 87, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-355.
Net worth maintenance requirement.

Each savings bank shall maintain an adequate net worth appropriate for the conduct of its business and the protection of its savings account holders. The net worth adequacy of a savings bank shall be determined by the commissioner on a regular basis, but not less than one (1) time per year after evaluating the character of management, the quality of assets, history of earnings and the retention thereof, the potential volatility of the deposit structure and the institution’s capacity to furnish the broadest service to the public. A written report of such finding and determination shall be made and filed by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 86; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 88; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 88, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-357.
Deposit accounts.

Every savings bank shall be authorized to solicit deposits from any person, natural or corporate, except as restricted or limited by law, or by such regulations as the commissioner may prescribe.

Savings banks may receive deposits of funds upon such terms as the contract of deposit shall provide to establish methods of withdrawals.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 87; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 89; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 89, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-359.
Joint accounts.

Accounts may be in the name of two (2) or more persons, whether minor or adult, in such form that the money in the accounts are payable to either adult, or their survivors, and such money due under such accounts, and all additions thereto, shall be the property of such persons as joint tenants with the right of survivorship. The money due under such accounts may be paid to, or on the order of, any one of such persons during his lifetime or to, or on the order of, any one of the survivors of such persons. The opening of the account in such form shall be conclusive evidence with regard to the liability of the savings bank of the intention of all of the parties to the account to vest title to money due under the account and the additions thereto in such survivor or survivors. By written instructions given to the savings bank by all parties to the account, the signatures of more than one (1) of such persons during their lifetime, or of more than one (1) of the survivors after the death of any one of them, may be required for withdrawal, in which case the savings bank shall pay the money in the account only in accordance with such instructions. However, no such instructions shall limit the right of the survivor or survivors to receive the money in the account. By written agreement with the savings bank, any person may create a joint account with other persons as joint tenants with the right of survivorship and such agreement may be signed only by the persons creating the account.

The savings bank, unless instructed in writing to the contrary, may loan money to any one or more persons constituting a single membership or account as joint tenants with the right of survivorship, and any person authorized to make withdrawals as provided in this section may pledge, hypothecate or assign all, or any part of, the money due, or to become due, under such account. Any such pledge, hypothecation or assignment, or any increase to, or withdrawal from, the account shall not destroy the joint tenancy with the right of survivorship.

Payment of all or any of the money in such account, as provided in this section, shall discharge the savings bank from liability with respect to the money so paid, prior to receipt by the savings bank of a court order. After receipt of such court order, a savings bank may refuse, without liability, to honor any withdrawal on the account pending determination of the rights of the parties. No savings bank paying any survivor in accordance with the provisions of this section shall thereby be liable for any estate, inheritance or succession taxes which may be owed to this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 88; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 90; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 90, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-361.
Accounts of administrators, executors, guardians, trustees and other fiduciaries.

Any savings bank may accept accounts in the name of any administrator, executor, guardian, trustee or other fiduciary in trust for a named beneficiary or beneficiaries. Such fiduciary shall have the authority to vote as a member of the savings bank as if any membership account were held absolutely, and to make payments upon, and withdraw from, any such account in whole or in part. The withdrawal value of any such account, or other rights relating thereto, may be paid or delivered, in whole or in part, to such fiduciary without regard to any notice as long as such fiduciary is living. The payment or delivery to any such fiduciary or a receipt of acquittance signed by any such fiduciary to whom any such payment or any such delivery or rights is made shall be valid and sufficient release and discharge of any savings bank for the payment or delivery so made. Whenever a person holding an account in a fiduciary capacity dies and no written notice of the revocation or termination of the trust relationship has been given to a savings bank and the savings bank has no notice of any other disposition of the trust estate, the withdrawal value of such account, or other rights relating thereto, may at the option of a savings bank be paid or delivered, in whole or in part, to the beneficiary or beneficiaries of such trust. Whenever an account is opened by any person describing himself as trustee for another and there is no further notice of the existence and terms of a legal and valid trust, then such description shall be given in writing to such savings bank. In the event of the death of the person so described as trustee, the withdrawal value of such account, or any part thereof, may be paid to the person for whom the account was thus stated to have been opened. Such account, and all additions thereto, shall be the property of such person, unless prior to payment the trust agreement is presented to the savings bank showing a contrary interest. When made in accord with this section, the payment or delivery to any such beneficiary, beneficiaries or designated person, or a receipt or acquittance signed by any such beneficiary, beneficiaries or designated person for any such payment or delivery shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of a savings bank for the payment or delivery so made. Trust accounts permitted by this chapter shall not be required to be acknowledged and recorded. When an account is opened in a form described in this section, the right set forth in Section 81-14-363 shall apply. No savings bank paying any beneficiary in accordance with the provisions of this section shall thereby be liable for any estate, inheritance or succession taxes which may be owed to this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 89; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 91; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 91, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-363.
Accounts payable at death.

[Effective from and after January 1, 2020, this section will read as follows:]

An account in a savings bank may be opened by any person or persons with directions to make such account payable upon his or their death to the named beneficiary or beneficiaries. When an account is so opened, the savings bank shall pay any money to the person or persons opening such account during his or their lifetime in the same manner as if the account were in the sole name or names of such person or persons.

If the named beneficiary or one (1) of the named beneficiaries survive the death of the person opening such an account and the beneficiary or all of the beneficiaries so named are sixteen (16) years of age or over at the death of such person, the savings bank shall pay the money to the credit of the account, less all proper setoffs and charges, to the named beneficiary or beneficiaries or upon his or their order, as hereinafter provided. Such payment by the savings bank shall be valid, notwithstanding any lack of legal age of the named beneficiary or beneficiaries. However, where such an account is opened or subsequently held by more than one (1) person, the death of one (1) of such persons shall not terminate the account and the account shall continue as to the surviving person or persons and the named beneficiary or beneficiaries subject to the provisions of subsection (3).

If the named beneficiary or all of the named beneficiaries survive the death of the person or persons opening such an account and are under sixteen (16) years of age at such time, the savings bank shall pay the money to the credit of the account, less all proper setoffs and charges:

When or after the named beneficiary becomes sixteen (16) years of age, to the named beneficiary or upon his order; or

When more than one (1) beneficiary is named, the savings bank shall pay to each beneficiary so named his proportionate interest in such account as each severally becomes sixteen (16) years of age; or

To the legal guardian of the named beneficiary, wherever appointed and qualified, or where more than one (1) beneficiary is named, the savings bank shall pay such beneficiary’s proportionate interest in such account to his legal guardian wherever and whenever appointed and qualified; or

If no guardian is appointed and qualified, payment may be made in accordance with the provisions of Section 93-20-209 or 93-20-431 in situations to which such sections are applicable.

Where the death of the person or persons opening such an account terminates the account under the provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section and where one or more of the named beneficiaries are under sixteen (16) years of age and the remainder of the named beneficiaries are sixteen (16) years of age or over, the savings bank shall pay the money to the credit of the trust, less all proper setoffs and charges, to:

The named beneficiaries sixteen (16) years of age or over at the time of termination of said account pursuant to subsection (2) of this section; and

The named beneficiaries under sixteen (16) years of age at the time of termination of said account pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

Where such account is opened or subsequently held by more than one (1) person, the savings bank in the absence of any written instructions to the contrary, consented to by the savings bank, shall accept payments made to such account and may pay any money to the credit of such account from time to time to, or pursuant to the order of, either or any of such persons during their life or lives in the same manner as if the account were in the sole name of either of such persons.

When a person or persons opens an account in a savings bank in the form set forth in subsection (1) of this section, and makes a payment or payments to such account, or causes a payment or payments to be made to such account, such person or persons shall be conclusively presumed to intend to vest in the named beneficiary or beneficiaries a present beneficial interest in such payments made, and in the money to the credit of the account from time to time, to the end that, if the named beneficiary or beneficiaries survive the person or persons opening such an account, all the right and title of the person or persons opening such an account in and to the money to the credit of the account at the death of such person or persons, less all proper setoffs and charges, shall at such death, vest solely and indefeasibly in the named beneficiary or beneficiaries subject to the conditions and limitations of subsection (3).

If the named beneficiary predeceases the person opening such an account, the present beneficial interest presumed to be vested in the named beneficiary pursuant to subsection (6) of this section shall terminate at the death of the named beneficiary. In such case, the personal representatives of the named beneficiary, and all others claiming through or under the named beneficiary, shall have no right in or title to the money to the credit of the account, and the savings bank shall pay such money, less all proper setoffs and charges, to the person opening such an account, or pursuant to his order, in the same manner as if the account were in the sole name of the person opening such an account; provided, however, where such an account names more than one (1) beneficiary, the death of one (1) of the beneficiaries so named shall not terminate the account and the account shall continue as to the surviving beneficiary or beneficiaries subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section.

A savings bank which makes any payment pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, prior to service upon the savings bank of an order of court restraining such payment shall, to the extent of each payment so made, be released from all claims of the person or persons opening such an account, the named beneficiary or beneficiaries, their legal representatives, and all others claiming through or under them.

When an account is opened in a form described in subsection (1) of this section, the right of the named beneficiary or beneficiaries to be vested with sole and indefeasible title to the money to the credit of the account on the death of the person or persons opening such an account shall not be denied, abridged or in anyway affected because such right has not been created by a writing executed in accordance with the law of this state prescribing the requirements to effect a valid testamentary disposition of property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 90; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 92; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 2001; Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 7, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

Editor's Note.—

This section is set out above to correct errors in subsection (3)(d) in the version of the section effective from and after January 1, 2020, as it appeared in the 2019 Volume 18A Cumulative Supplement.

§ 81-14-365.
Collection of processing fee for returned checks.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a processing fee may be charged and collected by any savings bank for checks on which payment has been refused by the payor depository institution. A savings bank may also collect such fee for checks drawn on that savings bank with respect to an account with insufficient funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 91; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 93; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 93, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-367.
Right of setoff on deposit account.

A savings bank shall have a right of setoff, without further agreement or pledge, upon all deposit accounts owned by any member or customer to whom or upon whose behalf the savings bank has made an unsecured advance of money by loans. Upon default in the repayment of satisfaction thereof, the savings bank may cancel on its books all or any part of the deposit accounts owned by such member or customer and apply the value of such accounts in payment of such obligation.

A savings bank which exercises the right of setoff provided in this section shall first give a thirty-day notice to the member or customer that such right will be exercised. Such accounts may be held or frozen, with no withdrawals permitted, during the thirty-day notice period. Such accounts may not be canceled and the value thereof may not be applied to pay such obligation until the thirty-day period has expired without the member or customer having cured the default on the obligation. The amount of any member’s or customer’s interest in a joint account or other account held in the names of more than one (1) person shall be subject to the right of setoff provided in this section.

If a savings bank shall proceed in good faith as provided in this section, but it is later determined that the savings bank was not entitled to have held or set off funds, then the savings bank’s sole obligation shall be to return the funds to the member’s or customer’s account, together with interest at the rate that would have applied if the account had not been held or set off. The savings bank shall not otherwise be liable for any costs or damages. This section is not exclusive, but shall be in addition to contract, common law and other rights of setoff. Such other rights shall not be governed in any fashion by this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 92; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 94; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 94, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-369.
Savings accounts issued to minors or persons under disability; payment of withdrawals; powers of parent or guardian; withdrawals on death of holder.

A savings bank and any federal savings bank may issue savings accounts to any minor or other person under disability as the sole and absolute owner of such savings account. Such savings bank may receive payments by or for such owner, pay withdrawals, accept pledges to the savings bank, and act in any other manner with respect to such account on the written instruction of such savings account holder in accord with this chapter. Any payment or delivery of rights to any minor or other person under a disability, or a receipt or acquittance signed by a minor or other person under a disability, who holds a savings account, shall be a valid and sufficient release of such savings bank for any payment so made or delivery of rights to such minor or person. The receipt, acquittance, pledge or other action required by the savings bank to be taken by such minor or person shall be binding upon such minor or person as if he were of full age and legal capacity. The parent or guardian of such minor or person shall not in his capacity as parent or guardian have the power to attach or to transfer any savings account issued to, or in the name of, such minor or person; provided, however, that in the event of the death of such minor or person, the receipt or acquittance of either parent, a person standing in loco parentis, guardian or conservator of such minor or person shall be a valid and sufficient discharge of such savings bank for any sum not exceeding One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), unless the minor or person has given written notice to the savings bank not to accept the signature of such person.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 93; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 95; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 95, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-371.
Deposit accounts as deposit of securities.

Notwithstanding any restrictions or limitations contained in any law of this state, the deposit accounts of any state savings bank or of any federal savings bank having its principal office in this state, may be accepted by any agency, department or official of this state in any case wherein such agency, department or official acting in its or his official capacity requires that securities be deposited with such agency, department or official.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 94; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 96; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 96, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-373.
New account books.

Upon the filing with a savings bank by the holder of records as shown by the books of the savings banks, or by his legal representative, of an affidavit to the effect that the account book, certificate or other evidence of ownership of his savings account with the savings bank has been lost or destroyed, and that such account book or certificate has not been pledged or assigned in whole or in part, such savings bank shall issue a new account book or certificate in the name of the holder of record. Such savings bank shall in no way be liable thereafter for the original account book or certificates, unless the board of directors requires a bond in an amount sufficient to indemnify the savings bank against any loss which might result from the issuance of such new account book or certificate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 95; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 97; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 97, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-375.
Transfer of deposit accounts.

The owner of a deposit account may transfer his rights therein absolutely or conditionally to any other person eligible to hold such rights, but such transfer may be made on the books of the savings bank and accompanied by the proper application for transfer by the transferor and transferee. Such transferor and transferee shall accept such account subject to the terms and conditions of the account contract, the bylaws of the savings bank, the provisions of its certificate of incorporation, and all rules and regulations of the commissioner. Notwithstanding the effectiveness of such a transfer between the parties thereto, the savings bank may treat the holder of record of a deposit account as the owner thereof for all purposes, including payment and voting, until such transfer and assignment has been recorded by the savings bank.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 96; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 98; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 98, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-377.
Authority of power of attorney.

A savings bank may continue to recognize the authority of an individual holding a power of attorney in writing to manage or to make withdrawals, either in whole or in part, from the deposit account of a customer or member until it receives written or actual notice of death, or of adjudication of incompetency of such member, or revocation of the authority of such individual holding such power of attorney. Payment by the savings bank to an individual holding a power of attorney prior to receipt of such notice shall be a total discharge of the savings bank’s obligation as to the amount so paid.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 97; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 99; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 99, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-379.
Adverse claims to accounts.

Notice to any savings bank doing business in this state of an adverse claim to an account on its books in the name of any savings account holder shall not cause the savings bank to recognize such adverse claimant, unless: (a) such adverse claimant either procures a restraining order, injunction or other appropriate process against the savings bank from a court of competent jurisdiction wherein the savings account holder, in whose name the account appears, is made a party and served with summons; or (b) such adverse claimant executes to the savings bank, in form and with sureties acceptable to it, a bond indemnifying it from any and all liability, loss, damage, costs and expenses for and on the account of the payment of such adverse claim.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 98; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 100; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 100, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-381.
Accounts of deceased nonresidents.

When an account is held in any savings bank by a person residing in another state or country, the account, or any part thereof, not in excess of Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00), may be paid to the administrator or executor appointed in the state or country where the account holder resides at the time of death; provided, however, that such administrator or executor has furnished the savings bank with (a) authenticated copies of his letters and of the order of the court which issued the letters to him authorizing him to collect, receive and remove the personal estate, and (b) an affidavit by the administrator or executor stating that to his knowledge no letters are then outstanding in this state and no petition for letters by an heir, legatee, devisee or creditor of the decedent is pending on the estate in this state, and that there are no creditors of the estate in this state. Upon payment or delivery to such representative after receipt of the affidavit and authenticated copies, the savings bank is released and discharged to the same extent as if the payment or delivery had been made to a legally qualified resident executor or administrator. Such savings bank is not required to see to the application or disposition of the property. No action at law or in equity shall be maintained against the savings bank for payment made in accordance with the above provisions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 99; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 101; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 101, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-383.
Payments to successors without administration.

Any savings bank may pay to the successor of a deceased depositor, as defined in Section 91-7-322(2), without necessity of administration, any sum to the credit of the deceased not exceeding Twelve Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($12,500.00) upon affidavit that the deceased died leaving no will and testament and bond signed by each of the successors guaranteeing payment of any lawful debts of the deceased to the extent of that withdrawal. The receipt of acquittance of the person or persons so paid shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge to the savings bank against all other persons and claimants for any payment so made; however, the bond is made available to any creditor for suit against the makers of the bond.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 100; Laws, 1995, ch. 380, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 102; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 102; Laws, 2003, ch. 394, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 81-14-385.
Savings accounts as legal investments and as security for bonds.

Administrators, executors, custodians, guardians, trustees, pension funds and other fiduciaries of every kind and nature, insurance companies, business and manufacturing companies, banks, credit unions and all other types of financial institutions, charitable, educational and eleemosynary institutions and organizations hereby are specifically authorized and empowered to invest funds held by them, without any order of any court, in savings accounts of savings banks which are under state supervision, and in accounts of insured savings banks. Such investments shall be deemed and held to be legal investments for such funds. With respect to investments by custodians, savings banks hereby are deemed to be qualified institutions within the meaning of that term as used in the Uniform Gifts to Minors Law of this state.

The provisions of this section are supplemental to any and all other laws relating to and declaring what shall be legal investments for the persons, fiduciaries, corporations, organizations and officials referred to in this section, and the laws relating to the deposit of securities and the making and filing of bonds for any purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 101; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 103; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 103, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-387.
Power to borrow money.

A savings bank may borrow up to twenty-five percent (25%) of its savings liability and net worth for lending purposes; a savings bank may borrow an additional twenty-five percent (25%) of its savings liability and net worth for the purpose of making loans guaranteed by the Federal Housing Administration, a private mortgage guaranty insurance company licensed to do business in this state, or by the Veterans Administration; a savings bank may borrow up to fifty percent (50%) of its savings liability and net worth to pay withdrawals. Borrowing of additional amounts for purchase or construction of a home office or branch office is authorized, but only with approval of the commissioner. Subsequent reduction of savings liability and net worth shall not in any way affect outstanding obligations, but shall be reported to the commissioner and steps taken to comply within a reasonable time. The directors may pledge or authorize the officers to pledge any assets of the saving s bank to secure any loans herein permitted. For the purpose of this paragraph, use of savings accounts in the savings bank shall not be considered borrowing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 102; Laws, 1996, ch. 400, § 39; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 104; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 104, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-14-389.
Authority to join federal reserve bank.

Any state savings bank shall have the power to subscribe to the capital stock and become a member of a federal reserve bank. Any such savings bank shall continue to be subject to the supervision and examination required by the laws of this state, except that the Federal Reserve Board shall have the right, if it deems necessary, to make examinations. The commissioner may disclose to the Federal Reserve Board, or to the examiners duly appointed by it, all information in reference to the affairs of any savings bank which has become, or desires to become, a member of a federal reserve bank.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 489, § 103; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 364, § 105; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 457, § 105, eff from and after July 1, 2001.